California statutes. Penal Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

4490.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4491.

All proceeds from the sale of bonds, except those derived from premiums and accrued interest, shall be available for the purpose provided in Section 4485 but shall not be available for transfer to the General Fund to pay principal and interest on bonds. The money in the fund may be expended only as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4492.

Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest or other increment resulting from the investment of moneys deposited in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4493.

Money in the fund may only be expended for projects specified in this title as allocated in appropriations made by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4494.

(a) It is the intent of the people in enacting this bond act that jail authorization and construction proceed as quickly as possible. Due to the severe shortage of jail facilities and the need to begin construction of jail facilities as soon as possible, all decisions of the board regarding construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or replacement of jail facilities financed by this title shall be final.

(b) No court shall have jurisdiction over these decisions of the board absent a showing, beyond a reasonable doubt, of a gross abuse of discretion by the board.

(c) Should an action be commenced alleging gross abuse of discretion by the board, no court shall have jurisdiction to delay, prohibit, or interfere with the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or replacement of the subject jail facilities. The sole remedy available to the court is a mandate that steps be taken to mitigate the abuse of discretion.

(d) Nothing in this title is intended in any way to delay, prohibit, or interfere with the construction of jail facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4495.

If any provision of this title, or the application thereof, is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or applications of the title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.8. COUNTY CORRECTIONAL FACILITY CAPITAL EXPENDITURE AND YOUTH FACILITY BOND ACT OF 1988 [4496. - 4496.48.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4496. - 4496.04.]

4496.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.02.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) While the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1981, the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1984, and the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986 have helped eliminate many of the critically overcrowded conditions found in county correctional facilities in the state, many problems remain.

(b) Numerous county jails and juvenile facilities throughout California are dilapidated and overcrowded.

(c) Capital improvements are necessary to protect life and safety of the persons confined or employed in jail facilities and to upgrade the health and sanitary conditions of those facilities.

(d) County jails are threatened with closure or the imposition of court supervision if health and safety deficiencies are not corrected immediately.

(e) Due to fiscal constraints associated with the loss of local property tax revenues, counties are unable to finance the construction of adequate jail and juvenile facilities.

(f) Local facilities for adults and juveniles are operating over capacity and the population of these facilities is still increasing. It is essential to the public safety that construction of new facilities proceed as expeditiously as possible to relieve overcrowding and to maintain public safety and security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.04.

As used in this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 4496.34.

(b) “Fund” means the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 4496.10.

(c) “County correctional facilities” means county jail facilities, including separate facilities for the care of mentally ill inmates and persons arrested because of intoxication, but does not include county juvenile facilities.

(d) “County juvenile facilities” means county juvenile halls, juvenile homes, ranches, or camps, and other juvenile detention facilities.

(e) “Youth center” means a facility where children, ages 6 to 17, inclusive, come together for programs and activities, including, but not limited to, recreation, health and fitness, delinquency prevention such as antigang programs and programs fostering resistance to peer group pressures, counseling for problems such as drug and alcohol abuse and suicide, citizenship and leadership development, and youth employment.

(f) “Youth shelter” means a facility that provides a variety of services to homeless minors living on the street or abused and neglected children to assist them with their immediate survival needs and to help reunite them with their parents or, as a last alternative, to find a suitable home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Program [4496.10. - 4496.19.]

4496.10.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.12.

(a) (1) Moneys in the fund, up to a limit of four hundred ten million dollars ($410,000,000), may be available for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, and replacement of county correctional facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance on county correctional facilities. However, deferred maintenance for facilities shall only include items with a useful life of at least 10 years.

(2) Moneys in the fund, up to a limit of sixty-five million dollars ($65,000,000), may be available for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, and replacement of county juvenile facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance on county juvenile facilities, but may only be used for the purpose of reducing overcrowding and eliminating health, fire, and life safety hazards.

(3) Expenditure shall be made only if county matching funds of 25 percent are provided as determined by the Legislature, except that this requirement may be modified or waived by the Legislature where it determines that it is necessary to facilitate the expeditious and equitable construction of state and local correctional facilities.

(b) Moneys in the fund, up to a limit of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), may be available for the purpose of making awards to public or private nonprofit agencies or joint ventures, or a combination of those entities, for purpose of purchasing equipment and for acquiring, renovating, or constructing youth centers or youth shelters, as may be provided by statute. Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available for youth centers and ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available for youth shelters and shall be distributed by the Department of the Youth Authority. However, any remaining money that has not been awarded under this subdivision within two years of the effective date of this title shall be available for both youth centers and youth shelters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.16.

In order to be eligible to receive funds for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4496.12 derived from the issuance of bonds under this title, a county shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt a plan to prohibit the detention of all juveniles in county jails unless otherwise authorized by law.

(b) Demonstrate that it has adequate facilities for mentally ill inmates or detainees and for those persons arrested because of inebriation, or demonstrate that it has a plan for the provision of services to these persons.

(c) Demonstrate that it has utilized, to the greatest practicable extent, alternatives to jail incarceration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.17.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall administer funds appropriated for juvenile facilities as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4496.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1130, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.19.

Money in the fund may only be expended for projects specified in this chapter as allocated in appropriations made by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Fiscal Provisions [4496.30. - 4496.48.]

4496.30.

Bonds in the total amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this title and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.32.

The bonds authorized by this title shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.34.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this title, the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this title, the finance committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Board of Corrections is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.36.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 4496.12 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.38.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.40.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 4496.42, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.42.

For the purposes of carrying out this title, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section, plus any interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, shall be returned to the General Fund from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.43.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.44.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.46.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.47.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute such documents as required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4496.48.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this title are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 264, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 86 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.85. COUNTY CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES CAPITAL EXPENDITURE AND YOUTH FACILITY BOND ACT OF 1988 ALLOCATIONS [4497. - 4497.56.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [4497. - 4497.]

4497.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that approval by the electors of the County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988 has made new funds available for the construction and renovation of county jails and county juvenile facilities. The Legislature hereby directs the Board of Corrections to allocate and administer the moneys intended in the County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988 for county jails, and the Department of the Youth Authority to allocate and administer the moneys intended in the County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988 for juvenile facilities, in accordance
 with the provisions of this title.

(b) Money appropriated for allocation under this title may be used for the renovation, replacement, reconstruction, or construction of county jail facilities, county medical facilities designated to house persons charged with or convicted of a crime and who are experiencing mental illness, and county juvenile facilities. Money appropriated by this title may also be used for construction of separate local detention facility space for detoxification of persons arrested because of intoxication.

(c) It is the Legislature’s intention to make the money appropriated for allocation under this title available to counties with established and documented needs for capital projects for jail and juvenile facilities. However, that money shall not be used to build
 facilities that the counties cannot afford to operate fully and safely.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 15.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Jails [4497.02. - 4497.16.]

4497.02.

(a) For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) “Board” means the Board of Corrections.

(2) “Fund” means the 1988 County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Fund.

(b) The Board of Corrections shall not itself be deemed a responsible agency, as defined by Section 21069 of the Public Resources Code, or otherwise be subject to the California Environmental Quality Act for any activities under this
 title, the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Acts of 1981 or 1984, or the County Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986. This subdivision does not exempt any local agency from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.04.

Money appropriated to the board for allocation pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Funding shall be provided for those projects entitled to be funded under subdivision (c) of Section 3 of Chapter 444, Statutes of 1984, as amended, and Section 5 of Chapter 1519, Statutes of 1986, to the extent that those projects have not received full funding.

(b) The following additional amounts shall be allocated to the counties for the construction, reconstruction, replacement, or renovation
 of county jail facilities. These funds shall not be used to supplant local funds directed to previously approved state projects. Nor shall these funds be used to reimburse counties whose match on previously approved projects exceeded the required 25 percent. These funds may be used for allocations specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Chapter 444, Statutes of 1984, as amended, and Section 5, subdivision (b) of Chapter 1519, Statutes of 1986.CountyAllocationAlameda $ 6,441,198Alpine 62,541Amador 0Butte 1,900,266Calaveras 0Colusa 0Contra Costa 1,420,488Del Norte 1,317,106El Dorado 0Fresno 4,326,606Glenn 732,094Humboldt 2,116,523Imperial 0Inyo 1,214,025Kern 9,650,404Kings 891,687Lake 1,699,291Lassen 727,717Los Angeles 172,682,741Madera 0Marin 2,166,458Mariposa 117,478Mendocino 1,214,270Merced 2,446,318Modoc 181,761Mono 120,421Monterey 7,429,146Napa 358,819Nevada 1,179,930Orange 21,723,387Placer 2,022,123Plumas 166,775Riverside 10,476,076Sacramento 6,299,898San Benito 1,270,642San Bernardino 10,874,718San Diego 32,675,959San Francisco 17,015,321San Joaquin 12,377,292San Luis Obispo 2,033,185San Mateo 2,452,925Santa Barbara 2,438,604Santa
 Clara 11,780,710Santa Cruz 2,889,829Shasta 0Sierra 119,234Siskiyou 0Solano 1,125,732Sonoma 3,877,521Stanislaus 3,649,178Sutter 964,137Tehama 532,947Trinity 225,380Tulare 2,513,889Tuolumne 677,876Ventura 14,733,637Yolo 686,721Yuba 1,844,691TOTAL $387,845,675(c) If any county declares that it is unable to use the funds allocated to it under this section, or if any county is unable to satisfy the prerequisites for funding listed in Section 4494.10, the amount allocated to the county in this section shall revert to the state, to be reallocated by the board.

(d) If funds beyond those needed for the itemized amounts
 become available for reallocation, the board shall reallocate those funds under subdivision (e).

(e) Reverted funds under this chapter or subdivision (c) of Chapter 1519 of the Statutes of 1986 shall be reallocated to counties pursuant to the development and adoption of a new allocation plan as determined by an allocation advisory committee appointed by the board. The allocation advisory committee shall convene upon notification by the board that funds have been reverted. Reallocated funds shall be distributed three times. The first distribution shall occur on December 31, 1990; the second distribution shall occur on December 31, 1992, and the final distribution shall occur on December 31, 1993. If any county seeking funds has not completed architectural drawings at the time reallocation funds become available, the county shall be removed from reallocation consideration until it has completed architectural drawings.

(f) Any county that receives funds pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to Chapter 444 of the Statutes of 1984, as amended, or Chapter 1519 of the Statutes of 1986, that, in the aggregate, total ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less may pool or combine those funds for the purpose of financing a jail construction project, subject to approval of the project pursuant to this chapter. However, under no circumstances shall the pooling of successive bond allocations relieve or exempt the county from its obligation to meet the 25 percent local match requirement.

This subdivision shall not be interpreted as an authorization to utilize allocated funds to reimburse counties whose match on previously approved and completed projects exceeded the required 25 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.05.

Money in the 1986 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Fund and money in the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Fund may be used on the same project so long as the project is consistent with the purposes set forth in Sections 4485 and 4496.12 and is subject to the restrictions and requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 4497.04. The deadlines applicable under this title shall be applicable to the joint use of funds under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.06.

(a) The board shall administer the funds allocated in this chapter to adult jail facilities, according to existing County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure Fund regulations, except as those regulations may be amended to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The board shall apply its regulations in the approval or disapproval of county jail projects, except that the board may approve a project if the board finds, after conducting a public hearing, that although the county cannot possibly meet the regulations, the county will
 nonetheless comply with Section 4485.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.08.

No state moneys shall be encumbered in contracts with a county, nor released to a county, for construction or renovation of a local jail facility pursuant to this chapter until the conditions of this chapter have been fulfilled by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.10.

To be eligible for funding consideration, a county shall, to the satisfaction of the board, do all of the following:

(a) Certify that juveniles are not housed in the county’s adult detention facilities, except where authorized by law, and document the existence of, or plans for, separate housing for juveniles.

(b) Document the existence of, or plans for, separate housing for persons detained or arrested because of intoxication, which will prevent mixing of this category of prisoner with other prisoners. If the county has no existing provisions for detoxification housing, it shall make provisions for that
 housing as part of its proposed project.

(c) Document the existence of, or plans for, separate housing for defendants or convicted prisoners with mental health disorders, which will prevent mixing of this category of prisoner with other prisoners until the time that the responsible health authority or the health authority’s designee clears specific prisoners for nonseparate housing, based on clinical judgment. If the county has no existing provisions for separate housing of
 prisoners with mental health disorders, it shall make provisions for that housing as part of its proposed project.

(d) (1) Submit a formal project proposal to the board on or before September 30, 1990. The project proposal shall describe the construction or renovation project to be undertaken and shall include an estimated budget for the project. The proposal shall also identify how county funding obligations, both for construction and operation of the facility, will be met. The project proposal shall be consistent with the needs and priorities identified in the needs assessment by the county.

(2) Failure to submit a project proposal shall be deemed a declaration by the county that it does not intend to request its allocation under subdivisions
 (a) and (b) of Section 4497.04, and the amounts allocated in those subdivisions to the county shall be available for reallocation by the board. The board may waive this requirement for submission of a proposal within one year if it determines there are unavoidable delays in the county’s preparation of a project proposal.

(e) Submit architectural drawings that shall be approved by the board for compliance with minimum jail standards and by the State Fire Marshal for compliance with fire safety requirements. If the board concludes that a county’s proposed construction or renovation contains serious design deficiencies that, while they would not require a refusal to enter into the contract, would seriously impair the facility’s functioning, it shall notify the sheriff and the board of supervisors of that county of the deficiencies and shall
 delay entering into a contract with the county for at least 30 days after mailing the letter. This letter shall be a public record.

(f) The county shall certify that it owns, or has long-term possession of, the construction site.

(g) The county shall have filed a final notice of determination on its environmental impact report with the board.

(h) The county has formally adopted a plan to finance the
 construction of the proposed facility.

(i) The county shall have submitted a preliminary staffing plan for the proposed facility, along with an analysis of other operating costs anticipated for the facility, to the board for review and comment. Prior to submission of the staffing plan and operating costs analysis of the board, the county board of supervisors shall have reviewed and approved the submittal in or following public hearings. The sheriff shall also have reviewed and commented on the preliminary staffing plan and the operating cost analysis. The board shall comment in writing to the sheriff and board of supervisors. This letter shall be a public record.

(j) (1) The county shall submit either a major or minor needs assessment
 documenting the need for and purpose of the proposed project. The needs assessment shall meet all requirements listed in the applicable County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Fund regulations. The board may exempt a county from performing a new needs assessment if any of the following conditions exist:

(A) The board determines that a prior needs assessment is in substantial compliance and it justifies the project being funded in Section 4497.04.

(B) A county receives funds from this bond act in an amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) or less.

(2) If exempted from performing a needs assessment, counties shall provide an analysis of specific jail deficiencies, including levels of security, program,
 including, but not limited to, medical and mental health care, housing, and administration. This analysis shall also include specific plans for correcting the deficiencies.

(k) (1) Demonstrate to the board, unless the county’s sole project is a remodel of an existing adult detention facility that will not result in the addition of any beds, that it is using, to the greatest extent feasible, alternatives to incarceration based on the following measures:

(A) An incarceration rate of no more than one standard deviation above the mean for all counties.

(B) Either a pretrial misdemeanor incarceration rate of no more than one standard deviation above the mean for all counties or a sentenced prisoner
 alternatives percentage or 5 percent or more as related to total sentenced prisoner admissions.

(2) (A) The data to be used in establishing the incarceration rate will be the 1989 calendar year average daily population as reported by each county to the board and the Department of Finance Report on Population by County.

(B) The pretrial misdemeanor incarceration rate will be based on an average of the daily pretrial misdemeanor jail population, developed from a four-day sample period in 1989 specified by the board.

(C) The sentenced prisoner alternatives percentage will be based on enrollment in three programs: Section 4024.2 of the Penal Code (work-in-lieu of jail), county parole, and home
 detention if the placement is made after some jail time is served.

(D) Counties failing to demonstrate adequate use of alternatives to incarcerations by the above measure by March 30, 1990, shall be reevaluated annually by the board. If any county is unable to satisfy the requirements of this section by September 30, 1993, the amount allocated to the county shall revert to the state, to be reallocated by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4497.04.

(l) Begin construction or renovation work within four years of the effective date of this title. If a county fails to meet this requirement, any allocations to the county under this chapter shall be deemed void and moneys allocated to the county shall revert to the board for reallocation. The board may waive this
 requirement if it determines that there are unavoidable delays in the initial construction activities.

(m) Counties shall provide for the construction of appropriate courtroom facilities and hearing room facilities within any jail construction plan submitted to the board. Those courtroom facilities and hearing room facilities shall be utilized for purposes of holding appropriate arraignments and bail hearings and for the conduct of parole revocation hearings. The board may waive this requirement where county specific circumstances dictate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 16.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.12.

(a) County match on projects funded under this chapter shall be a minimum of 25 percent of the total project costs.

(b) The county match requirement imposed upon counties pursuant to the receipt of state moneys shall not be required to be made on a pro rata basis where the requirement would impede the expeditious and equitable construction of county correctional facilities. However, under no circumstances shall the county match for any county project be less than 25 percent.

(c) Costs eligible for state
 funding and as county match shall be those defined in applicable existing sections of the County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure Fund regulations, which regulations may be amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1057, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.14.

(a) The board shall not approve the expenditures of funds allocated under this act for the construction of county detention facilities until a master site plan for county detention facilities has been prepared and adopted by the board of supervisors of the county proposing to construct the facility. The board of supervisors shall determine the location of any detention facilities pursuant to a master plan, which determination shall not be subject to any initiative or ordinance adopted by initiative. In developing the plan, the board of supervisors shall consider alternatives to additional detention
 facilities and the specific concerns of incorporated cities and other community representatives, and shall give special consideration to existing federal, state, and local detention facilities in order to avoid over-concentration of inmates in one geographic area of the county. If the board of supervisors decides to locate new or expanded detention facilities near existing detention facilities, it shall publicly state its reasons for that decision.

The board shall only approve expenditure of funds allocated under this chapter for the construction of detention facilities in accordance with the plan adopted pursuant to this section. The board may exempt a county from this requirement if the master site plan remains unchanged from that approved under the provisions of the County Correctional Facilities Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986. 

(b) The board shall establish construction costs controls and
 shall set forth in regulation procedures for setting maximum state funding levels for appropriate construction unit costs, including cost per cell for specified categories of facilities. These cost controls shall be based on average costs in recently constructed facilities in California that are comparable in size, use, location, and other relevant factors.

Allocations listed in Section 4497.04 notwithstanding, the state contribution shall be up to 75 percent of total project costs or up to 75 percent of the applicable construction cost norms, whichever is lower. Nothing in this section is intended, however, to prescribe maximum limits on county funding levels for the projects.

Prior to releasing any funds to a county, the board shall review construction cost levels in the funded projects for compliance with cost control regulations. 

(c) Prior to entering
 into a contract with a county, the board shall review or approve or both review and approve the county submissions required by this chapter regarding the facility or facilities proposed for funding.
